Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-644
Owner, with respect to a vehicle, defined.

Owner, with respect to a vehicle, shall mean a person, other than a person holding a security interest, having the property in or title to a vehicle, including a person entitled to the use and possession of a vehicle subject to a security interest in another person, but excluding a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 140.